Idaho, session 2025, S1217.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $811,900 $8,063,000 $8,874,900
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 372,500 1,976,300 2,348,800
TOTAL $1,184,400 $10,039,300 $11,223,700
II. ENFORCEMENT:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $220,800 $220,800
III. FISHERIES:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $70,000 $240,000 $310,000
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 750,000 1,755,100 2,505,100
TOTAL $820,000 $1,995,100 $2,815,100


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
IV. WILDLIFE:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $70,000 $70,000
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund $124,300 67,400 191,700
Fish and Game Expendable Trust
Fund 800,000 800,000
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 0 2,433,700 2,433,700
TOTAL $124,300 $3,371,100 $3,495,400
V. COMMUNICATIONS:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $550,000 $550,000
GRAND TOTAL $124,300 $5,925,500 $12,255,200 $18,305,000
SECTION 2. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR PROJECTS. There is hereby
reappropriated to the Department of Fish and Game any unexpended and unen-
cumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Department of Fish
and Game from non-General Funds related to deferred maintenance projects,
the Pocatello office remodel, and website overhaul for fiscal year 2025 to be
used for nonrecurring expenditures for the period July 1, 2025, through June
30, 2026.
SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR DEPREDATION FUNDS. There is
hereby reappropriated to the Department of Fish and Game any unexpended and
unencumbered balances appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game in the
Wildlife Program from the Expendable Big Game Depredation Fund in an amount
not to exceed $1,800,000 to be used for nonrecurring expenditures related to
the payment of depredation claims for fiscal year 2025 for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller shall con-
firm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with
the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation au-
thorized herein.
SECTION 4. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 65, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for the Wildlife Pro-


gram $270,000 from the Fish and Game Expendable Trust Fund to be expended for
operating expenditures for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 4 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.